Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.064

Application for change in compensation.

If change of circumstances warrants an increase or rearrangement of compensation, like application shall be made therefor. Where the application has been granted, compensation and other benefits if in order shall be allowed for periods of time up to sixty days prior to the receipt of such application.

[ 2011 c 346 s 304.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.